test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lookkmosh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lookkmõš e-stem hand, arm/käsi: # Noun - full paradigm
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: lookkmõš
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: lookkmõʹšše
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: lookkmõõžžâst
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Com+Indef: lookkmõõžžin
     lookkmõš+N+Ess+Indef: lookkmõšân
     lookkmõš+N+Par+Indef: lookkmõšâd
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [lookkmõõžžtaa, lookkmõõžžtää]
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: lookkmõõžži
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: lookkmõõžžid
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: lookkmõõžžid
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: lookkmõõžžin
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Com+Indef: lookkmõõžživuiʹm
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [lookkmõõžžitaa, lookkmõõžžitää]
